Hawaii statutes.
§576D-2 Designation of child support
enforcement agency; duties. There is created the child support enforcement
agency for the State as required under Title IV-D. The agency shall be within
the department of the attorney general. The child support enforcement agency
shall:

(1) Be responsible for formulating the state child
support enforcement plan as required under Title IV-D; and

(2) Administer this chapter consistent with Title
IV-D and applicable state laws. [L 1986, c 332, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 13, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next